src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
! ========================
!! # Sublexica for verb roots
! ========================

!!     -----------------------------
!!     Main types, from Bokmålsordboka
!!     v1  kaste       kaster      kasta       kasta
!!                                kastet      kastet
!!     v2  lyse        lyser       lyste       lyst
!!        reparere    reparerer   reparerte   reparert
!!     v3  leve        lever       levde       levd
!!     v4  nå          når         nådde       nådd
!!     v4  bie         bier        bidde       bidd
!!   
!!     Subtypes
!!     v12 v1 or v2
!!     v13 v1 or v3
!!     v14 v1 or v4
!!     v1-s passive v1 verbs
!!     v2-s passive v2 verbs
!!     v3-s passive v3 verbs


! =========================== !
!! ## Sublexica for regular verbs 
! =========================== !

!! ### Preliminary lexica

LEXICON vx
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** points to v1.
  v1 ;

LEXICON v12 ! 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for both v1 and v2 past forms, or: score -> scoret, scorte (NG  = do not generate)
                 +V:     inf-prsptc ;
                 +V:     regpres    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>ar #   ;
                         a-et-pret  ;
            +Use/NG:     te-pret    ;

LEXICON v13 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** also here: v1, v3: sveve -> svevet (NG), svevde.
                       +V:     inf-prsptc ;
                       +V:     regpres    ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>ar #          ;
                  +Use/NG:     a-et-pret  ;
                               de-pret    ;


LEXICON v23
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
          v2 ;
+Use/NG:  v3 ;

LEXICON v14
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** where v4 is NG
         v1 ;
+Use/NG: v4 ;

LEXICON v1 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** =  kaste
                 +V:     inf-prsptc ;
                 +V:     regpres    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>ar #   ;
                         a-et-pret  ;


LEXICON v2 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = blåse, studere
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: regpres    ;
     te-pret    ;

LEXICON v2et
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = demme
     +V: inf-prsptc ;
     +V: regpres    ;
         te-pret    ;
+Use/NG: et-pret    ;

LEXICON v2a
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = demme
     +V:  inf-prsptc ;
     +V:  regpres    ;
          te-pret    ;
+Use/NG:  a-pret     ;

LEXICON v3 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** =  leve
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: regpres    ;
     de-pret    ;

LEXICON v3et
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = bygge
      +V: inf-prsptc ;
      +V: regpres    ;
          de-pret    ;
 +Use/NG: et-pret    ;

LEXICON v4 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** =  ro, bie
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: r-pres     ;
     dde-pret   ;

LEXICON v4et
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = bygge
      +V: inf-prsptc ;
      +V: r-pres     ;
          dde-pret   ;
 +Use/NG: et-pret    ;

!LEXICON v-s ! fritas ! ikkje i bruk
!     +V+Inf: # ;
! +V+Ind+Prs: # ;

LEXICON v1-s 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** =  undres
     +V+Inf: # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs: # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt: # ;
  +V+PrfPrc: # ;

LEXICON v2-s 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** =  føles, synes
     +V+Inf:   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:Q1 # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:Q1 # ;

LEXICON v3-s 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** =  trives
     +V+Inf:   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:Q2 # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:Q2 # ;





! ---------------------
!! ## Conjugation sublexica
! ---------------------

LEXICON inf-prsptc
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 
                    +Inf:       #          ;
               +Inf+Pass:%>s    #          ;
     +Inf+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>a    #          ;
+Inf+Pass+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>ast  #          ;
                    +Imp:%>Q3X4 #          ;
                 +PrsPrc:%>     prsptcsuff ;
  +PrsPrc+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>ande #          ;
        +Der1+Der/NomAct:%>ing  f1         ;

LEXICON regpres
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 
              +Ind+Prs:%>er  # ;
         +Ind+Prs+Pass:%>es  # ;
      +Ind+Prs+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>ast # ;

LEXICON r-pres
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 
              +Ind+Prs:%>r  # ;
         +Ind+Prs+Pass:%>s  # ;
 +Ind+Prs+Pass+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>st # ;

LEXICON a-et-pret
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 
           +V+Ind+Prt:%>a  # ;
    +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:%>et # ;
            +V+PrfPrc:%>a  # ;
     +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:%>et # ;
       +Ex/V+PrfPrc+A:%>et positive-indef ;
       +Ex/V+PrfPrc+A:%>ed positive-def ;

LEXICON te-pret
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 
 +V+Ind+Prt:%>Q3te # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:%>Q3t  # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Ex/V+A:%>Q3t  positive ; ! over til adj
 
LEXICON de-pret
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 
 +V+Ind+Prt:%>Q3de # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:%>Q3d  # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Ex/V+A:%>Q3d  positive ;

LEXICON et-pret
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 
         +V+Ind+Prt:%>et # ;
          +V+PrfPrc:%>et # ;
       +Ex/V+PrfPrc+A:%>et positive-indef ;
       +Ex/V+PrfPrc+A:%>ed positive-def ;

LEXICON a-pret
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 
         +V+Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
          +V+PrfPrc:%>a # ;
       +Ex/V+PrfPrc+A:%>a positive-indecl ;

LEXICON dde-pret
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 
 +V+Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:%>dd  # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Ex/V+A:%>dd  positive ;


LEXICON prsptcsuff
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 
         :ende # ;
 +Nynorsk+Use/NG:ande # ;



! ================================== !
!! ### Sublexica for irregular verbs 
! ================================== !


LEXICON BE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:be   #          ;
          +V+Imp:be   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:ber  #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bes  #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:bes  #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:ba   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:bedt #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:be   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON BETY !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
                :bety    v4 ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:betød   #  ;
LEXICON BINDE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:binde  #          ;
          +V+Imp:bind   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:binder #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bindes #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:bindes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:bandt  #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:bundet #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:bind   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON XITE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
           +V+Inf:ite  #          ;
           +V+Imp:it   #          ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:iter #          ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ites #          ;
      +V+Inf+Pass:ites #          ;
       +V+Ind+Prt:eit  #          ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:et   #          ;
        +V+PrfPrc:itt  #          ;
        +V+PrsPrc:it   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON BLI !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
             +V+Inf:bli   #          ;
             +V+Imp:bli   #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prs:blir  #          ;       
         +V+Ind+Prt:blei  #          ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:ble   #          ;
          +V+PrfPrc:blitt #          ;
          +V+PrsPrc:bliv  prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON BLIVE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
             +V+Inf:blive    # ;
             +V+Imp:bliv     # ;
         +V+Ind+Prs:bliver   # ;
         +V+Ind+Prt:blev     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Radical:bleiv    # ;
          +V+PrfPrc:blevet   # ;
          +V+PrsPrc:blivende # ;
LEXICON BRENNE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:brenne  #          ;
          +V+Imp:brenn   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:brenner #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:brennes #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:brennes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:brant   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:brente  #          ; ! XXX todo: TV/IV
       +V+PrfPrc:brent   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:brunnet #          ; ! XXX todo: TV/IV
       +V+PrsPrc:brenn   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON BRESTE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:breste  #          ;
          +V+Imp:brest   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:brester #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:brestes #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:brestes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:brast   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:brustet #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:brest   prsptcsuff ;
