src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
analysere v2 ;
andøve v3et ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
atskille v2 ;
avfeie v3et ;
påkreve v3 ;
avleie v3 ;
avnorske v1 ;
avrundes v1-s ;
avsky v4 ;
avspeile v12 ;
bale v12 ;
barbarisere v2 ;
be: BE ;
bebygge v3et ;
bedøve v3 ;
befri v4 ;
begrunne vx ;
bekjempe v1 ;
bekle v4 ;
besinne vx ;
besørge v1 ;
bete v4 ;
betone v12 ;
betrygge v3 ;
bety: BETY ;
bevares v1-s ;
bie v4 ;
binde: BINDE ;
bite:b XITE ;
bleike v12 ;
blendes v1-s ;
bli: BLI ;
blive: BLIVE ;
blø v4 ;
brasere v2 ;
bre v4 ;
breide v1 ;
breie v3et ;
brenne: BRENNE ;
breste: BRESTE ;
bule v12 ;
bunne vx ;
byfornye v4 ;
bygge v3et ;
bøye v3et ;
bøyes v3-s ;
dannes v1-s ;
dekretere v2 ;
demme v2et ;
diffundere v2 ;
digge v1 ;
djevles v1-s ;
djupfryse vx ;
dreie v13 ;
drønne vx ;
drøvtygge v3 ;
døye v3 ;
effektivere v2 ;
elde v1 ;
eldes v1-s ;
erkjenne v2 ;
erstattes v1-s ;
etterprøve v3 ;
familiegjenforene v2et ;
ferdes v1-s ;
fire v2 ;
fiske v1 ;
flekke v2et ;
flenge v12 ;
fli v4 ;
flø v4 ;
flømme v2et ;
fnyse vx ;
forbinde:for BINDE ;
forbli:for BLI ;
forbrenne:for BRENNE ;
forebygge v3et ;
forene v2et ;
forlene v2et ;
forenkle v1 ;
foresveve v3 ;
forgylle v2et ;
forminskes v1-s ;
fornøye v3et ;
forråde v4et ;
forslumme v1 ;
fortie v4 ;
fortsettes v1-s ;
fortvile v2 ;
fortøye v3 ;
forunne vx ;
frabe:fra BE ;
framskynde v12 ;
fraråde v4et ;
fremleie v3 ;
fri v4 ;
fråsse v1 ;
føde v2 ;
fødes v2-s ;
føles v2-s ;
føye v3et ;
føyke v3et ;
garnflå v4 ;
gaule v12 ;
gjenforene v2et ;
gjennomføres v1-s ;
gjennomtære v2et ;
glemmes v2-s ;
gnelle vx ;
gnette v1 ;
gre v4 ;
greie v13 ;
grillsteke v2 ;
gry v4 ;
grønnes v1-s ;
hanskes v1-s ;
harskne v1 ;
helle v2et ;
hore v1 ;
huke v12 ;
hule v2et ;
hvesse v2et ;
hyre v12 ;
høres v2-s ;
imaginere v2 ;
innbinde:inn BINDE ;
innby v4 ;
innebygge v3et ;
innføye v3et ;
inngyte vx ;
innkreve v3 ;
innmeldes v2-s ;
innpote v1 ;
innvie v14 ;
innøve v3 ;
inokulere v2 ;
jåle v13 ;
kaldflire v2 ;
kaldrøyke v2a ;
kavle v1 ;
kjave v13 ;
kjennes v2-s ;
kjøve v3 ;
kle v4 ;
klenge v2et ;
kna v4 ;
knabbe v1 ;
knase v12 ;
kneppe v2et ;
knuses v2-s ;
knyttes v1-s ;
koke v2 ;
kontingentere v2 ;
krase v12 ;
kreve v3et ;
krote v1 ;
kruse v12 ;
kvantifisere v2 ;
kveles v2-s ;
kveppe vx ;
kvesse v12 ;
kvie v14 ;
lage v13 ;
lagres v1-s ;
ledes v1-s ;
leie v3 ;
lepje v1 ;
lime vx ;
lite:l XITE ;
luftes v1-s ;
lykkes v2-s ;
lønne vx ;
løpe v2 ;
mangle v1 ;
meie v13 ;
minnes v2-s ;
misfarges v1-s ;
mislykkes vx ;
mistrives v2-s ;
misunne v2 ;
modnes v1-s ;
more v2et ;
mose v12 ;
myldre v1 ;
målbinde:mål BINDE ;
møtes v2-s ;
nage v13 ;
nedsnø v4 ;
neie v12 ;
nigråte vx ;
nominere v2 ;
nyve vx ;
nå v4 ;
nøkke v12 ;
nøre v2et ;
nøye v3 ;
oppheves v1-s ;
oppleve v3 ;
oppleves v2-s ;
opplyse v2 ;
oppøve v3 ;
overbygge v3et ;
overleve v3 ;
overtyde v13 ;
overveie v3 ;
pare vx ;
pimpe v1 ;
pines v2-s ;
plage v13 ;
plages v3-s ;
pole v12 ;
polemisere v2 ;
prale v2et ;
prøve v3 ;
påkle v4 ;
rage v13 ;
rake v12 ;
raportere v2 ;
rekke v2et ; ! rekke opp
rettleie v3 ;
ri v4 ;
rime vx ;
ringle v1 ;
rubrisere v2 ;
ryktes v1-s ;
råde v4et ;
råme vx ;
røyke v2a ;
sage v13 ;
saksøkes v2-s ;
sale v2et ;
samles v1-s ;
sammenbinde:sammen BINDE ;
sammenføye v3et ;
score v12 ;
skambite:skamb XITE ;
skatte v1 ;
skeine vx ;
skilles v2-s ;
skimtes v1-s ;
skite:sk XITE ;
skje v4 ;
skjemmes v2-s ;
skurve vx ;
skvære v3 ;
skylle v2et ;
sleike v12 ;
slektes v1-s ;
slenges v2-s ;
slimes v1-s ;
slite:sl XITE ;
slites v1-s ;
sløye v13 ;
smake v2 ;
smaske v1 ;
smi v4 ;
småbite:småb XITE ; ! bite
snakkes v2-s ;
sneie v13 ;
sole v12 ;
spa v4 ;
spase vx ;
speke v2et ;
spjåke v12 ;
spole v2et ;
sprede v23 ;
stare vx ;
stile v2et ;
stokke v1 ;
strene v12 ;
streve v3et ;
strype vx ;
strø v4 ;
støvsuge v3 ;
suse vx ;
sveipe v12 ;
svelle v2et ;
sveve v13 ;
svinebinde:svine BINDE ;
synes v2-s ;
søte vx ;
tape v2 ;
te v4 ;
tekke v2et ;
telgje v3et ;
tigge v1 ;
tilbe:til BE ;
tilføye v3et ;
tilråde v4et ;
tilskynde v12 ;
tilsmusses v1-s ;
tjærebre v4 ;
tone v12 ;
trives v3-s ;
tuve vx ;
tygge v3 ;
tære v2et ;
tøyes v3-s ;
underbygge v3et ;
undergrave v3 ;
underkue v1 ;
utbe:ut BE ;
utbre v4 ;
utbygge v3et ;
utebli:ute BLI ;
uteksperimentere v2 ;
utgrunne vx ;
utleie v3 ;
uttrykke v2et ;
utvinne vx ;
vade v3et ;
vake v12 ;
vantrives v3-s ;
vanære v3 ;
vedbli:ved BLI ;
veltes v1-s ;
veve v3et ;
vie v14 ;
vimre v1 ;
vises v2-s ;
våge v13 ;
våle vx ;
væte v2et ;
åle v12 ;
øve v3et ;
øyde v3 ;
